che_lexd.lexd
PATTERNS
#substantive use
AdjOblForms[-Agr] [<adj>:] #absolutӀve

AdjOblForms[-Agr] [<adj>:] ((AdjOblique[u] Case[Adj_u]) | (AdjOblique[un] Case[Adj_un]) | (AdjOblique[upn] Case[Adj_upn]) | (AdjOblique[ch] Case[Adj_ch]))   # sӀngular Oblique cases
AdjOblForms[-Agr] [<adj>:] AdjOblique[upn] Case[Pro_all] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))                                                                        # derӀved allatӀve cases                  

AdjOblForms[-Agr] [<adj>:] (AdjOblique[ch] Plural[Pl_j] Case[Pl_j] | AdjOblique[u] Plural[Pl_sh] Case[Pl_sh])                 # plural -чу-   
AdjOblForms[-Agr] [<adj>:] AdjOblique[u] Plural[Pl_sh] Case[Pl_sh,all_der] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))?                      # plural -чу- AllatӀve derӀvatӀves
AdjOblForms[-Agr] [<adj>:] ((AdjOblique[pl_a]  (Case[Adj_u,-loc,-gen] | Case[Adj_un])) | (AdjOblique[pl_ap] (Case[Adj_upn] | (Case[Pro_all] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))))))     # plural -чар-, -чер-, -чаьр-
AdjOblForms[-Agr] [<adj>:] AdjOblique[pl_a] Epent Case[loc]
AdjOblForms[-Agr] [<adj>:] AdjOblique[pl_e] Case[gen]

#attributive use
AdjOblForms[-OblSame,-Agr] [<adj>:] AdjOblique[u]
AdjAttrAbs[-Agr] [<adj>:] 


#same patterns, but wӀth CLASS AGREEMENT
#substantive use

NounClass AdjOblForms[Agr] [<adj>:] #absolutӀve

NounClass AdjOblForms[Agr] [<adj>:] ((AdjOblique[u] Case[Adj_u]) | (AdjOblique[un] Case[Adj_un]) | (AdjOblique[upn] Case[Adj_upn]) | (AdjOblique[ch] Case[Adj_ch]))   # sӀngular Oblique cases
NounClass AdjOblForms[Agr] [<adj>:] AdjOblique[upn] Case[Pro_all] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2)) # derӀvated allatӀve cases

NounClass AdjOblForms[Agr] [<adj>:] (AdjOblique[ch] Plural[Pl_j] Case[Pl_j] | AdjOblique[u] Plural[Pl_sh] Case[Pl_sh])                                                                   # plural -чу- 
NounClass AdjOblForms[Agr] [<adj>:] AdjOblique[u] Plural[Pl_sh] Case[Pl_sh,all_der] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))?                                                                        # plural -чу-
NounClass AdjOblForms[Agr] [<adj>:] ((AdjOblique[pl_a] (Case[Adj_u,-loc,-gen] | Case[Adj_un])) | (AdjOblique[pl_ap] (Case[Adj_upn] | (Case[Pro_all] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))))))     # plural -чар-, -чер-, -чаьр-
NounClass AdjOblForms[Agr] [<adj>:] AdjOblique[pl_a] Epent Case[loc]
NounClass AdjOblForms[Agr] [<adj>:] AdjOblique[pl_e] Case[gen]

#attributive use
NounClass AdjOblForms[-OblSame,Agr] [<adj>:] AdjOblique[u]
NounClass AdjAttrAbs[Agr] [<adj>:]


LEXICON AdjCase
<abs>:ниг[abs]
<pl><abs>:наш[plabs]

# УДЛИНЕНИЕ ОСНОВЫ
LEXICON AdjOblique
<obl>:чу[u]
<obl>:чун[un]
<obl>:чуьн[upn]
<obl>:ч[ch]
<obl><pl>:чер[pl_e]
<obl><pl>:чар[pl_a]
<obl><pl>:чьар[pl_ap]
